Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 1. Contempt.

Collateral references. —

17 Am. Jur. 2d, Contempt, § 1 et seq.

17 C.J.S., Contempt, § 1 et seq.

Enforcement of contract by party to procure insurance on his own life by contempt proceedings, 12 ALR2d 983.

Sufficiency of notice to, or service upon, contemnor’s attorney in civil contempt proceedings, 60 ALR2d 1244.

Who may institute civil contempt proceedings, 61 ALR2d 1083.

Disqualification of judge in proceedings to punish contempt against or involving himself or court of which he is a member, 64 ALR2d 600, 37 ALR4th 1004; 3 ALR Fed. 420.

Admissibility, in contempt proceeding against witness, of evidence of incriminating nature of question as to which he invoked privilege against self-incrimination, 88 ALR2d 463.

Admissibility, in contempt proceedings against witness, of newspaper articles as evidence of incriminating nature of question as to which he invoked privilege against self-incrimination, 88 ALR2d 466.

Appealability of acquittal from or dismissal of charge of contempt of court, 24 ALR3d 650.

Prejudicial effect of holding accused in contempt of court in presence of jury, 29 ALR3d 1399.

Appealability of contempt adjudication or conviction, 33 ALR3d 448.

Contempt adjudication or conviction as subject to review other than by appeal or writ of error, 33 ALR3d 589.

Defense of entrapment in contempt proceedings, 41 ALR3d 418.

Allowance of attorneys’ fees in civil contempt proceedings, 43 ALR3d 793.

Right of injured party to award of compensatory damages or fine in contempt proceedings, 85 A.L.R.3d 895.

Sec. 09.50.010.
Acts or omissions constituting contempt.

The following acts or omissions with respect to a court of justice or court proceedings are contempts of the authority of the court:

disorderly, contemptuous, or insolent behavior toward the judge while holding the court, tending to impair its authority or to interrupt the course of a trial or other judicial proceeding;

a breach of the peace, boisterous conduct, or violent disturbance, tending to interrupt the course of a trial or other judicial proceeding;

misbehavior in office, or other wilful neglect or violation of duty by an attorney, clerk, peace officer, or other person appointed or elected to perform a judicial or ministerial service;

deceit or abuse of the process or proceedings of the court by a party to an action or proceeding;

disobedience of a lawful judgment, order, or process of the court;

falsely pretending to act under authority to an order or process of the court;

rescuing a person or property in the custody of an officer by virtue of an order or process of the court;

unlawfully detaining a witness or party to an action or proceeding while going to, remaining at, or returning from the court where the witness or party is for trial;

any other unlawful interference with the process or proceedings of the court;

disobedience of a subpoena duly served, or refusing to be sworn or answer as a witness;

when summoned as a juror in a court, neglecting to attend or serve, or improperly conversing with a party to an action or proceeding to be tried at the court or with another person in relation to the merits of the action, or receiving a communication from a party or other person in respect to it without immediately disclosing it to the court;

disobedience by an inferior court, judge, magistrate, referee, master, or officer of the lawful judgment, order, or process of a higher court, or proceeding in an action or proceeding contrary to law after the action or proceeding is removed from the jurisdiction of that inferior court, judge, magistrate, or officer.

History.

(§ 10.01 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 124 SLA 2000; am § 31 ch 124 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For court rule on contempt generally, see Civ. R. 90; for specific acts constituting contempt, see Civ. R. 37(b), 45(f), 56(g) and 69(c), and AS

09.50.200

; for applicability of article to criminal actions, see AS

12.80.010

.

Sec. 09.50.020.
Penalties; damages; license revocation.

A person who commits a criminal contempt is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. A person who commits a civil contempt is subject to damages, a civil penalty of $5,000 or less for each violation, and other orders as the court finds appropriate.

In addition to the penalty specified in (a) of this section, the court may suspend, restrict, or revoke, for a period not to exceed six months, a driver’s license as defined in AS

28.90.990

, a license as defined in AS

25.27.244(s)

, or a recreational license, or any combination of these licenses, or the person’s ability to obtain the licenses, if

the person is a natural person;

the contempt is one under AS

09.50.010

(4) — (10); and

the court, sitting without a jury, finds by a preponderance of evidence that the contempt related to failure to pay money in connection with a child support action or proceeding or failure to comply with a subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity or child support proceeding.

In this section, “recreational license” means a recreational fishing license or recreational hunting license. In this subsection,

“recreational fishing license” means a sport fishing license under AS

16.05.340

unless that license is required for participation in personal use fishing, as defined in AS

16.05.940

, or subsistence fishing, as defined in AS

16.05.940

and modified by decisions of the Alaska Supreme Court;

“recreational hunting license” means a hunting license under AS

16.05.340

unless that license is required for participation in subsistence hunting, as defined in AS 16.05.940 and modified by decisions of the Alaska Supreme Court.

History.

(§ 12.02 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 132 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 124 SLA 2000; am § 12 ch 124 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 1 TSSLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, in (b) of this section, “AS

28.90.990

” was substituted for “AS

28.40.100

” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

28.40.100

.

Cross references. —

For procedures, see Civ.
R. 90. For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendments to this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 09.50.030.
Jury trial.

A person who is charged with contempt of court not committed in the presence of the court, where the act or thing so charged as a contempt is of such nature as to constitute also a criminal offense under a statute of the United States or a law of this state, has a right to jury trial.

History.

(§ 10.03 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.50.040.
Indemnification of party aggrieved.

If a loss or injury to a party in an action or proceeding has been caused by the contempt, the court, in addition to the punishment imposed for the contempt, may give judgment in favor of the party aggrieved and against the person guilty of contempt for a sum of money sufficient to indemnify that party and to satisfy the costs and disbursements of that party.
The judgment and the acceptance of that amount is a bar to an action or proceeding by the aggrieved party for the loss or injury.

History.

(§ 10.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For court rule on bond for appearance and satisfaction, see Civ.
R. 90(d).

Sec. 09.50.050.
Imprisonment to compel performance of an act.

When the contempt consists of the omission or refusal to perform an act which is yet in the power of the defendant to perform, the defendant may be imprisoned until the defendant has performed it.

History.

(§ 10.05 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.50.060.
Prosecution on nonappearance.

If the defendant does not appear on the day ordered by the court, the court may order the undertaking to be prosecuted. If the undertaking is prosecuted, the measure of damages is the extent of the loss or injury sustained by the aggrieved party by reason of the misconduct for which the warrant was issued and the costs of the proceeding.

History.

(§ 10.06 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Secs. 09.50.070,
09.50.080.
Property subject to escheat; enforcement of rights by state. [Repealed, § 14 ch 133 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 09.50.090.
Transmittal of personal property to state. [Repealed, § 5 ch 78 SLA 1972.]

Secs. 09.50.100 — 09.50.160.
Escheat actions, claims, and reports. [Repealed, § 14 ch 133 SLA 1986.]